District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.07

Denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

The Department may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license for violation of any provision of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 7, 50 DCR 10914